Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW to read as follows:(1) The domestic violence co-responder account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from fees imposed for deposit in the domestic violence co-responder account under RCW 36.18.010 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for:(a) The domestic violence co-responder grant program created in section 2 of this act; and(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, other programs and services to address domestic violence.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.280 RCW to read as follows:(1) The domestic violence co-responder grant program is created to be administered by the office of crime victims advocacy.(2) The domestic violence co-responder grant program must:(a) Award matching grants to cities and counties for the purpose of establishing and operating domestic violence co-responder programs;(b) Provide contracted technical assistance and training for grantees using a service provider that has demonstrated effectiveness in providing domestic violence co-responder services; and(c) Provide contracted services to assist grantees in billing health insurance for domestic violence co-responder services.(3) For the purposes of this section, a "domestic violence co-responder program" is a program utilizing domestic violence victim advocates that are summoned by law enforcement to the scene of a domestic violence incident and that provide whole family support, resource connection, and care navigation for victims.Sec. 3. RCW 36.18.010 and 2023 c 340 s 8 and 2023 c 277 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Except as otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to RCW 4.24.130, county auditors or recording officers shall collect the following fees for their official services:(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1. The fee for recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document; the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or transaction;(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $3; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or without seal, $2;(5) For issuing a marriage license((,)):(a) An $8 fee, (this fee includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital statistics); plus ((an))(b) An additional $5 fee for use and support of the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund; plus ((an))(c) An additional $10 fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund((. The legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW)); plus(d) An additional $100 fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit into the domestic violence co-responder account created in section 1 of this act;(6) For searching records per hour, $8;(7) For recording plats, 50 cents for each lot except cemetery plats for which the charge shall be 25 cents per lot; also $1 for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED, That there shall be a minimum fee of $25 per plat;(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170;(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW 65.04.047, $50, in addition to all other applicable recording fees;(11) For recording instruments, a $3 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library operations account created in RCW 43.07.129;(12) For recording instruments, a $2 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library-archives building account created in RCW 43.07.410 until the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building is paid in full;(13) For recording instruments, the surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.250; and(14) For recording instruments, except for documents exempt under RCW 36.22.185(2), an assessment as provided in RCW 36.22.185.--- END ---